District of Columbia statutes.
16-310

Finality of decrees of adoption.

An attempt to invalidate a final decree of adoption by reason of a jurisdictional or procedural defect may not be received by any court of the District, unless regularly filed with the court within one year following the date the final decree became effective.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 540, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-310.
1973 Ed., § 16-310.